Nevada, session 83, AB445.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A school library staff member is immune from criminal or
civil liability for good faith acts relating to providing access to or
assisting pupils in accessing library materials of a school library.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Library materials” includes, without limitation, books,
periodicals, pamphlets, journals, newspapers, audio materials,
audiovisual materials, instructional materials, maps, databases,
government documents, records and photographs.
(b) “School library staff member” means a school library
media specialist, school librarian, any licensed or unlicensed
employee of a school assigned to duties in a school library or any
person carrying out or assisting with the functions of a school
library media specialist or school librarian.
Sec. 2. Chapter 379 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Any staff member of a public library, including, without
limitation, a librarian employed by a public library, is immune
from criminal or civil liability for good faith acts relating to
providing access to or assisting library patrons in accessing library
materials of the public library.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. As used in this section, “library materials” includes,
without limitation, books, periodicals, pamphlets, journals,
newspapers, audio materials, audiovisual materials, instructional
materials, maps, databases, government documents, records and
photographs.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)